Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202514-1211
Bridges; condemnation; award; submission to electors.

(1) Within ninety days after a final condemnation award pursuant to section 14-1207 has been made, the city council of such city of the metropolitan class shall, if such city council elects to proceed further, introduce an ordinance providing for the submission to the electors of the city the question whether such award shall be confirmed and the property be taken and bonds of the kind or kinds determined by the city council, and stated upon the ballot, shall be issued in the amount of the award.

(2) Such proposition shall be submitted within ninety days after the ordinance becomes effective at a special election called for that purpose or at any general election and shall be carried if a majority of the electors voting on such proposition shall vote in favor of such proposition.

(3) No election and no vote of electors shall be required upon the question of acquiring by condemnation any bridge or issuing revenue bonds as authorized by section 14-1217 for the acquisition by condemnation of any existing bridge, if the city council determines by a vote of a majority of its members to dispense with such election or vote of electors as to such question.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 7, p. 615;

C.S.1929, § 14-1207;

Laws 1935, c. 28, § 2, p. 126;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1207;

R.S.1943, § 14-1211;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 40, p. 464;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 246;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 14.